New York, session 2025-2026, A2353.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 72 of the state finance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) Five percent of any settlement money, totaling one million dollars 4 or more, paid to the state, shall be directly applied to the debt prin- 5 cipal in the state's general debt service fund. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05712-01-5